Nevada, session 83, AB254.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 223 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Community Project Grant Program is hereby
created for the purpose of awarding grants to nonprofit
corporations to conduct projects that benefit communities in this
State.
2. The Director shall administer the Grant Program.
3. The Director shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out
the Grant Program, including, without limitation, regulations that
prescribe:
(a) The criteria for eligibility for such a grant and the
procedures for the submission and review of applications for and
the awarding of such a grant, including, without limitation, a
separate process with criteria and procedures suitable for a
nonprofit corporation that:
(1) Has an annual revenue that does not exceed
$1,000,000; or
(2) Has been in existence for less than 5 years after the
effective date of its recognition as tax-exempt by the Internal
Revenue Service; and
(b) Requirements for reporting expenditures of the money
from such a grant.
4. On or before October 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Director shall prepare and transmit a written report to the
Legislature concerning the applications submitted for grants
under the Grant Program during the immediately preceding
biennium.
5. As used in this section, “nonprofit corporation” means a
corporation that:
(a) Operates exclusively for any exempt purpose under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. §501(c)(3); and
-
*AB254_R1*

– 3 –
(b) Is recognized as exempt by the Internal Revenue Service
pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C. §501(c)(3).
Sec. 3. 1. The Account for the Community Project Grant
Program is hereby created in the State General Fund.
2. The Director shall administer the Account.
3. In addition to any direct legislative appropriation, the
Office may apply for and accept any gift, grant, bequest, donation
or other source of money. Any money so received must be
deposited in the Account.
4. The money in the Account must be used only to carry out
the Community Project Grant Program created by section 2 of this
act.
5. Any interest and income earned on money in the Account,
after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the
Account.
6. All claims against the Account must be paid as other
claims against the State are paid.
7. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 3.3. NRS 223.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.460 As used in NRS 223.460 to 223.498, inclusive, and
sections 2 and 3 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
the words and terms defined in NRS 223.462 to 223.470, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3.7. NRS 223.482 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.482 [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 3 of
this act, the Office may apply for and receive any gift, grant,
contribution or other money from any source to carry out the
provisions of NRS 223.460 to 223.498, inclusive [.] , and sections 2
and 3 of this act.
Sec. 4. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 5. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB254_R1*